Maine, session 132, LD1111.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Miscellaneous Acts and Resolves - Finance 0306
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Kennebec Water District to expand water
service infrastructure in Fairfield in response to perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances, or PFAS, contamination in private wells.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $10,000,000 $0